Maryland, session 2026, HB1319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
13–702.
(a) This section applies to the Maryland Defense Force and the National Guard.
(b) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE
Governor may order the militia into State active duty:
(1) in times of or on reasonable apprehension of imminent public crisis,
disaster, rioting, catastrophe, insurrection, invasion, tumult, or breach of peace;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1319*

HOUSE BILL 1319
(2) when martial law is declared;
(3) to enforce the laws; or
(4) to carry on any function of the militia of the State.
(c) (1) To enforce the laws, a member of the militia in State active duty has all
the authority of a peace or law enforcement officer.
(2) The authority of the member extends throughout the State during the
State active duty.
(d) Whenever the militia is in State active duty, the ranking officer of the militia
ordered into State active duty or that officer’s subordinates on State active duty shall:
(1) cooperate with local law enforcement authorities; or
(2) if the exigencies of the case require and subject only to order from the
Governor:
(i) direct and control local law enforcement authorities and the
Department of State Police; and
(ii) assume all the powers vested in these subordinated law
enforcement authorities.
(E) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “ACTIVE DUTY COMBAT” MEANS PERFORMING THE
FOLLOWING SERVICES IN THE ACTIVE FEDERAL MILITARY SERVICE OF THE UNITED
STATES:
1. PARTICIPATION IN AN ARMED CONFLICT;
2. PERFORMANCE OF A HAZARDOUS SERVICE RELATING
TO AN ARMED CONFLICT IN A FOREIGN STATE; OR
3. PERFORMANCE OF A DUTY THROUGH AN
INSTRUMENTALITY OF WAR.
(III) “OFFICIAL DECLARATION OF WAR” MEANS AN OFFICIAL
DECLARATION OF WAR MADE BY THE U.S. CONGRESS UNDER ARTICLE I, § 8,
CLAUSE 11 OF THE U.S. CONSTITUTION.

HOUSE BILL 1319 3
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE
GOVERNOR MAY NOT ORDER THE MILITIA OR ANY MEMBER OF THE MILITIA INTO
ACTIVE DUTY COMBAT UNLESS THE U.S. CONGRESS HAS PASSED AN OFFICIAL
DECLARATION OF WAR OR HAS TAKEN AN OFFICIAL ACTION UNDER ARTICLE I, § 8,
CLAUSE 15 OF THE U.S. CONSTITUTION TO EXPLICITLY CALL FORTH THE STATE
MILITIA OR ANY MEMBER OF THE STATE MILITIA TO EXECUTE THE LAWS OF THE
UNITED STATES, REPEL AN INVASION, OR SUPPRESS AN INSURRECTION.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR
PROHIBIT THE GOVERNOR FROM DEPLOYING THE MILITIA OR A MEMBER OF THE
MILITIA UNDER U.S.C. TITLE 32, DEFENSE SUPPORT OF CIVIL AUTHORITIES,
WITHIN THE UNITED STATES AND U.S. TERRITORIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.